Louisiana, session 2026, HB484.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:4702(B)(2)(a), (d), and (f), (3)(b) and (c), and (6)(b) and (c) are
hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4702. Board of commissioners; appointment and term; organization
* * *
B.
* * *
(2) The board shall be composed of twelve nine members who shall be
appointed as follows:
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1178 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 484
(a) The United States Representative who represents Louisiana's second
congressional district National Aeronautics and Space Administration shall appoint
one member.
* * *
(d) The state senator from Senate District 1 New Orleans Business Alliance
shall appoint one member.
* * *
(f) The mayor of the city of New Orleans shall appoint five two members as
follows: one member shall be appointed from a list of three names submitted by the
Vietnamese Initiatives in Economic Training, one member shall be appointed from
a list of three names submitted by the East New Orleans Neighborhood Advisory
Commission, one member shall be appointed from a list of three names submitted
by the New Orleans Regional Black Chamber of Commerce, one member shall be
appointed from a list of three names submitted by the board of commissioners for the
Port of New Orleans, and one member shall be appointed from a list of three names
submitted by The Greater New Orleans American Federation of Labor and Congress
of Industrial Organizations.
* * *
(3)
* * *
(b) Any vacancy in the membership of the board occurring by reason of the
expiration of the term of office, or by reason of death, resignation, disqualification,
or otherwise, shall be filled by the respective nominating entity appointing authority
within sixty days after receipt by such nominating entity appointing authority of
written notification of the vacancy. In the event that If the respective nominating
entity appointing authority fails to fill the vacancy within sixty days after receipt of
written notification of the vacancy, the remaining members of the board shall appoint
an interim successor to serve on the board until the position is filled by the respective
nominating entity appointing authority responsible for the appointment of such
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1178 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 484
member. If the remaining members of the board fails fail to fill a vacancy in its their
membership within the next sixty day period, the mayor shall appoint such member.
Any board member appointed by the remaining members of the board or mayor
pursuant to this Subparagraph may be replaced at any time by the nominee of the a
member appointed by the appointing authority.
(c) Any member who has unexcused absences of four consecutive meetings,
regular and special, of the board in any calendar year shall be disqualified and
removed automatically from office and that person's position shall be vacant, as of
the first day of the succeeding calendar year. Such vacated position shall be filled
by the respective nominating entity appointing authority for the balance of the
vacated term within fifteen days. The former member shall not be eligible to be
nominated appointed to the board or to serve on the board again.
* * *
(6)
* * *
(b) Any member of the board appointed pursuant to Subparagraphs (2)(a)
through (k) of this Subsection may be removed by his respective appointing authority
at any time, with cause.
(c) No board member appointed pursuant to Subparagraph (2)(a), (b), (c), (f),
or (g) Subparagraph (2)(b), (c), (e), (f),(g), or (h) of this Subsection shall sit on the
board beyond the end of the term of office of the appointing authority that appointed
that board member without being reappointed to the board in the manner for which
appointments to the board are provided for in Paragraph (2) or (3) of this Subsection;
provided however, the board member shall be eligible for reappointment.
* * *
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1178 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 484